Missouri, session 2026, HB1661.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 1.205, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 1.205, to read as follows:
1.205. 1. The general assembly of this state finds that:
(1) The life of each human being begins at conception;
(2) Unborn children have protectable interests in life, health, and well-being and are
entitled to the same rights, powers, privileges, justice, and protections as are secured or
granted by the laws of this state to any other human person;
(3) The natural parents of unborn children have protectable interests in the life,
health, and well-being of their unborn child.
2. Effective January 1, 1988, the laws of this state shall be interpreted and construed
to acknowledge on behalf of the unborn child at every stage of development, all the rights,
privileges, and immunities available to other persons, citizens, and residents of this state,
subject only to the Constitution of the United States, and decisional interpretations thereof by
the United States Supreme Court and specific provisions to the contrary in the statutes and
constitution of this state.
3. As used in this section, the term "unborn children" or "unborn child" shall include
all unborn child or children or the offspring of human beings from the moment of conception
until birth at every stage of biological development.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1661 2
4. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as creating a cause of action against a
woman for indirectly harming her unborn child by failing to properly care for herself or by
failing to follow any particular program of prenatal care.
✔